Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-842
State employees; jurisdiction of commission; restricted.

The jurisdiction of the Commission of Industrial Relations to establish salary or base salary levels or other terms of compensation for state employees shall not be invoked before the end of the 1987 regular session of the Legislature and if so invoked shall only be effective beginning with fiscal year 1987-88 and each fiscal year thereafter. The Legislature may, during the 1987 regular session, prohibit by law any order of the Commission of Industrial Relations relating to state employees for fiscal year 1987-88 if it finds such order will be inconsistent with any legislation passed during the 1987 regular session dealing with collective bargaining by state employees. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the State Employees Collective Bargaining Act is inconsistent with an order relating to state employees for fiscal year 1987-88 and therefor such orders shall be prohibited.

Laws 1986, LB 1250, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 31.

State Employees Collective Bargaining Act, see section 81-1369.